ko: 장착 볼트 패턴: 3볼트 삼각형; 4볼트 사각형; 5볼트 별; 6볼트 원형; 기타
bg-BG: Модел на монтажни болтове: 3–болтов триъгълно; 4–болтов квадратно; 5–болтова звезда; 6–болтов кръгъл; Друго
ru: Схема расположения крепежных болтов: 3-болтовое треугольное; 4-болтовое квадратное; 5-болтовое звездообразное; 6-болтовое круговое; Другое
it: Schema dei bulloni di montaggio: Triangolare a 3 bulloni; quadrato a 4 bulloni; Stella a 5 bulloni; circolare a 6 bulloni; Altro
lt-LT: Tvirtinimo varžtų išdėstymas: 3 varžtų trikampis; 4 varžtų kvadratas; 5 varžtų žvaigždutė; 6 varžtų apskritimas; Kita
ja: 取り付けボルトのパターン: 3ボルト三角形; 4ボルト四角形; 5ボルト星形; 6ボルト円形; その他
cs: Rozvržení montážních šroubů: 3 šrouby do trojúhelníku; 4 šrouby do čtverce; 5 šroubů do hvězdy; 6 šroubů do kruhu; Jiné
sk-SK: Montážny vzor skrutiek: 3-skrutkový trojuholníkový; 4-skrutkový štvorhran; 5-skrutová hviezda; 6-skrutkový kruhový; Iné
sv: Monteringsbultmönster: 3-bults triangulär; 4-bults fyrkant; 5-bults stjärna; 6-bults cirkulär; Övrigt
pt-BR: Padrão de furação de montagem: Triangular de 3 parafusos; Quadrado de 4 parafusos; Estrela de 5 parafusos; Circular de 6 parafusos; Outro
th: รูปแบบรูยึด: แบบสามเหลี่ยมยึด 3 จุด; แบบสี่เหลี่ยมจัตุรัสยึด 4 จุด; แบบดาวยึด 5 จุด; แบบวงกลมยึด 6 จุด; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 安裝螺栓孔位: 3 螺栓三角形; 4 螺栓四方形; 5 螺栓星形; 6 螺栓圓形; 其他
zh-CN: 安装螺栓孔的布局: 三孔三角形; 四孔方形; 五孔星形; 六孔圆形; 其他
el: Διάταξη μπουλονιών στερέωσης: Τριγωνικό 3 βιδών; Τετράγωνο 4 μπουλονιών; Αστέρι 5 βιδών; Κυκλικό 6 βιδών; Άλλο
pt-PT: Padrão de furação de montagem: Triângulo de 3 parafusos; Quadrado de 4 parafusos; Estrela de 5 parafusos; Circular de 6 parafusos; Outro
ro-RO: Modelul șuruburilor de montare: Triunghi cu 3 șuruburi; Pătrat cu 4 șuruburi; Stea cu 5 șuruburi; Circular cu 6 șuruburi; Altele
fi: Kiinnityspulttijako: Kolmipulttinen, kolmion muoto; Nelipulttinen, neliön muoto; Viisipulttinen, tähden muoto; Kuusipulttinen, ympyrän muoto; Muu
vi: Kiểu bố trí bu lông lắp đặt: Tam giác 3 bu lông; Hình vuông 4 bu lông; Ngôi sao 5 bu lông; Hình tròn 6 bu lông; Khác
hu: Rögzítőcsavar-minta: 3 csavaros, háromszög alakú; 4 csavaros, négyszögletes; 5 csavaros, csillag; 6 csavaros, kör alakú; Egyéb
nl: Montageboutpatroon: 3-bouts driehoekig; 4-bouts vierkant; 5-bouts ster; 6-bouts cirkelvormig; Overig
es: Patrón de pernos de montaje: Triangular de 3 pernos; Cuadrado de 4 pernos; Estrella de 5 pernos; Circular de 6 pernos; Otros
pl: Rozstaw śrub montażowych: 3-śrubowy trójkątny; 4-śrubowy trójkątny; 5-śrubowy gwiazda; 6-śrubowy okrągły; Pozostałe
nb: Monteringsboltmønster: 3-bolts trekantet; 4-bolts firkant; 5-bolts stjerne; 6-bolts sirkulær; Annet
da: Hulmønster: Tre bolte, trekantet; Fire bolte, firkant; Fem bolte, stjerne; Seks bolte, cirkulær; Andet
fr: Configuration des trous de fixation: Triangulaire à 3 boulons; Carré à 4 boulons; Étoile à 5 boulons; Circulaire à 6 boulons; Autre
en: Mounting bolt pattern: 3-bolt triangular; 4-bolt square; 5-bolt star; 6-bolt circular; Other
tr: Montaj cıvata deseni: 3 cıvatalı üçgen; 4 cıvatalı kare; 5 cıvatalı yıldız; 6 cıvatalı dairesel; Diğer
de: Muster des Befestigungsbolzens: 3-Loch-Dreieck; 4-Loch-Vierkant; 5-Loch-Stern; 6-Loch-Rundsteckverschraubung; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Uzorak montažnih vijaka: Trokutasti s 3 vijka; Četverokutni s 4 vijka; Zvijezda s 5 vijaka; Okrugli sa 6 vijaka; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vzorec pritrdilnih vijakov: 3-vijak trikotni; 4-vijak kvadrat; 5-vijak zvezda; 6-vijak okrogli; Druga